Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9509
Direct agreement; sale or transfer; written consent.

A direct agreement shall not be sold or transferred by either party without the written consent of the other party to the direct agreement.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 9.